Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.460

Receivership—Termination—Conditions.

(1) The receivership shall terminate:

(a) When all deficiencies have been eliminated and the court determines that the facility has the management capability to ensure continued compliance with all requirements; or

(b) When all residents have been transferred and the facility closed.

(2) Upon the termination of a receivership, the court may impose conditions to assure the continued compliance with chapters 18.51 and 74.42 RCW, and, in the case of medicaid contractors, continued compliance with Title XIX of the social security act, as amended, and regulations promulgated thereunder.

[ 1989 c 372 s 12; 1987 c 476 s 15.]